Hawaii, session 2025, GM1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that roads for which
ownership or jurisdiction is in dispute between the State and a
county, commonly referred to as "roads in limbo", often suffer
from a lack of repair and maintenance. The legislature further
finds that government agencies are often unwilling to maintain
these roads due to liability concerns associated with its repair
or maintenance.
The legislature further finds that on the island of Hawaii,
there are 408.9 miles of roads in limbo located island wide.
There are also 122.6 miles of roads in limbo that are recognized
as government or homestead roads and 286.3 miles of paper roads,
or rights of way that are shown on tax maps but have not yet
been built. This situation highlights the urgent need for clear
action to address dilapidated roads while ensuring the State or
counties are not held liable for repairing or maintaining a road
that may not be under their jurisdiction under certain
circumstances.
2025-3360 HB860 CDl HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Authorize the State and counties to engage in repair
or maintenance of streets in cases in which the
ownership or jurisdiction of the streets is in dispute
between the State and a county with a population of
more than two hundred thousand but less than five
hundred thousand;
(2) Specify that the State or county that repaired or
maintained the street may only be held liable for acts
or omissions arising from the repair or maintenance
performed by the State or county on such street at any
time; and
(3) Deem that repair or maintenance of a street shall not
confer ownership or jurisdiction over such street if
the ownership or jurisdiction over the street is in
dispute between the State and the county.
SECTION 2. Chapter 663, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§663- Liability of the State or county repair or
maintenance of certain streets. (a) The State or county may
2025-3360 HB860 CDl HMSO

Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
repair or maintain any street of which the ownership or
jurisdiction is in dispute between the State and county.
The State or county that repaired or maintained the street,
as applicable, may only be held liable for acts or omissions
arising out of the repair or maintenance of that street that the
State or county performed at any time.
For the purposes of this subsection, "street" has the same
meaning as defined in section 291C-1.
(b) Agencies performing work pursuant to this section may
post notice, signage, or other public communication clarifying
that the repair does not establish permanent jurisdiction or
ownership.
(c) For the purposes of this section, repair or
maintenance of a street shall not be deemed to confer ownership
or jurisdiction over that street if the ownership or
jurisdiction over the street is in dispute between the State and
the county.
(d) This section shall apply only in a county with a
population of more than two hundred thousand but less than five
hundred thousand."
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-3360 HB860 CDl HMSO

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on upon its approval
and shall be repealed on July 1, 2030.
2025-3360 HB860 CDl HMSO
■■■■■■iiiiniNii

H.B. NO.
^0 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 6th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 860, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 860, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the eenate
Clerk of the Senate
209